Tennessee, session 114, SB0552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-1506, is amended by deleting
the language "thirty (30) days" and substituting "sixty (60) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies and certificates entered into, issued, delivered, amended, or renewed on or
after that date.
SB0552
002081
- 1 -